Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB186.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS 132.017 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The levy of an ad valorem tax rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%)
over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate shall be
subject to recall by placing a question on a ballot before the voters of the district.
(2) (a) A taxing district shall choose to cause the question to be submitted to the
voters of the district in either a called common election or at the next
regular election. The question shall be framed to ask whether the voter is
for the levy of the property tax rate.
(b) If the question is submitted to the voters in a called common election:
1. The taxing district shall inform the voters of the district about the
details of the election through posting the information on the first
page of the taxing district's website for a period of two (2) weeks; and
a. Publishing the information through the largest newspaper in the
county, whether viewable to the public through an online
subscription or by paper distribution, for a period of two (2)
weeks; or
b. Sending a single notice containing the information by first-class
mail to each person owning real property in the taxing district,
addressed to the property owner at his or her residence or
principal place of business as shown on the current year
property tax roll;
2. The cost of the election shall be borne by the taxing district;
3. The election shall comply with the provisions of KRS 118.025; and
Page 1 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
4. a. For taxing districts subject to KRS 65A.110, the election shall be
held not less than twenty-one (21) days nor more than forty-five
(45) days following:
i. The approval of the tax rate by the establishing entity; or
ii The expiration of the thirty (30) day failure to act deadline;
whichever occurs first; and
b. For all other taxing districts, the election shall be held not less
than twenty-one (21) days nor more than forty-five (45) days
following the adoption of an ordinance, order, resolution, or
motion to levy the tax rate.
(c) If the question is submitted to the voters in conjunction with the next
regular election, the question shall be submitted to the county clerk no later
than the second Tuesday in August preceding the election. The county clerk
shall cause to be published in accordance with KRS Chapter 424, at the
same time as other voter information, the full text of the proposal. The
county clerk shall cause to be posted in each polling place one (1) copy of
the full text of the proposal.
(3) (a) If a majority of the votes cast upon the question oppose its passage:
1. The tax rate is officially recalled;
2. The ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy the tax rate shall
be amended;
3. Any overpayment of tax as a result of the recall shall be refunded to
the taxpayer, at the cost of the taxing district, within sixty (60) days of
the election; and
4. The compensating tax rate shall be levied without further approval.
(b) If a majority of the votes cast upon the question favor its passage, the
ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy the tax rate shall remain
Page 2 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
effective.
(4) The taxing district may cause the cancellation of the election by reconsidering
and amending the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion so that it will levy the
compensating tax rate.
(5) Local, state, and federal tax dollars shall not be used to advocate, in partial terms,
for or against any public question that appears on the ballot under this section.
For purposes of this section, "local" means and includes any city, county, urban-
county government, consolidated local government, unified local government,
charter county, or special district.
(6) Notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary, if a taxing district has
not established a final tax rate as of September 15, due to the provisions of this
section or Section 2, 5, 6, or 7 of this Act, tax bills shall be prepared for the taxing
district as required in KRS 133.220 based on the compensating tax rate.
Section 2. KRS 68.245 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The property valuation administrator shall submit an official estimate of real and
personal property and new property assessment as defined in KRS 132.010, to the
county judge/executive by April 1 of each year.
(2) No county fiscal court shall levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which
may be levied at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant
to KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon the[such] tax by the
voters of that county, which exceeds the compensating tax rate as defined in KRS
132.010, until the taxing district has complied with the provisions of subsection (5)
of this section.
(3) The state local finance officer shall certify to each county judge/executive, by June
30 of each year, the following:
(a) The compensating tax rate, as defined in KRS 132.010, and the amount of
revenue expected to be produced by it;
Page 3 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
(b) The tax rate which will produce no more revenue from real property,
exclusive of revenue from new property, than four percent (4%) over the
amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate as defined in KRS
132.010 and the amount of revenue expected to be produced by it.
(4) Real and personal property assessment and new property determined in accordance
with KRS 132.010 shall be certified to the state local finance officer by the
Department of Revenue upon completion of action on property assessment data.
(5) (a) A county fiscal court, proposing to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax
rate which may be levied at the request of a county community improvement
district pursuant to KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote
upon the tax by the voters of that county, which exceeds the compensating tax
rate as defined in KRS 132.010, shall hold a public hearing to hear comments
from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be held in
the principal office of the taxing district, or, in the event the taxing district has
no office, or the office is not suitable for a hearing, the hearing shall be held in
a suitable facility as near as possible to the geographic center of the district.
(b) County fiscal courts of counties containing a city of the first class proposing
to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be levied at the
request of a county community improvement district pursuant to KRS
107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon the tax by the voters of
that county, which exceeds the compensating tax rate as defined in KRS
132.010, shall hold three (3) public hearings to hear comments from the
public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearings shall be held in three (3)
separate locations; each location shall be determined by dividing the county
into three (3) approximately equal geographic areas, and identifying a suitable
facility as near as possible to the geographic center of each area.
(c) The county fiscal court shall advertise the hearing by causing to be published
Page 4 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the newspaper of largest
circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than twelve
(12) column inches, the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearings which shall be held not less
than seven (7) days nor more than ten (10) days, after the day that the
second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(d) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property, addressed to the property owner at his or her residence or principal
place of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(e) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The county fiscal court may
set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(6) (a) [That portion of ]A tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be
levied at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant to
KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon a tax by the
Page 5 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
voters of that county, levied by an action of a county fiscal court which will
produce revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property,
more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 shall be subject to a recall
vote or reconsideration by the taxing district, as provided for in KRS 132.017,
and shall be advertised as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The county fiscal court shall, within seven (7) days following adoption of an
ordinance to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be
levied at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant to
KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon a tax by the
voters of that county, which will produce revenue from real property,
exclusive of revenue from new property as defined in KRS 132.010, more
than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010, cause to be published, in
the newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type
advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the county fiscal court has adopted a rate; and
2. The fact that the[ part of the] rate[ which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010] is subject to recall[; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate].
Section 3. KRS 75A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon the creation of a district, the trustees of a district are authorized to
provide fire services, emergency medical services subject to KRS Chapter
Page 6 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
311A, or rescue services pursuant to KRS Chapter 39F, as provided in
paragraph (c) of this subsection, and to levy a tax upon the property in the
district.
(b) The property taxed shall be subject to county tax, and the tax levied by the
board upon creation of the district shall be approved by the county fiscal
court, consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified
local government having jurisdiction over the district at the time of passage of
the ordinance creating the district. The tax shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10)
per one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for
the purpose of defraying the expenses for the provision of fire services or
rescue services. The rate set in this subsection shall apply, notwithstanding the
provisions of KRS 132.023.
(c) The district that establishes and operates an emergency ambulance service and
is the primary service provider in the district may levy a tax upon the property
in the district. The tax to be levied shall be proposed by the board, shall be
approved by the county fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter
county government, or unified local government having jurisdiction over the
district and the tax shall not exceed twenty cents ($0.20) per one hundred
dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for the purpose of
defraying the expenses of the provision of fire services, emergency medical
services, or rescue service, or to make contracts for fire protection for the
districts as provided in KRS 75.050. The rate set in this subsection shall
apply, notwithstanding KRS 132.023.
(d) 1. Any increase of the total tax levy beyond the rate initially approved by
the board and authorized by the county fiscal court, consolidated local
government, charter county government, or unified local government
shall be subject to KRS 132.023. Any increase in excess of the annual
Page 7 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
compensating rate for the consolidated emergency services district shall
require the approval of the county fiscal court, consolidated local
government, charter county government, or unified local government
having jurisdiction over the district. If at any time an election[ resulting
from a recall petition] pursuant to KRS 132.017 is required, the question
shall be presented to all voters in every precinct for which any part of
the precinct is served by the district[ subject to the recall petition].
2. If two (2) or more established consolidated emergency services merge to
create a new consolidated emergency services district, as authorized in
this chapter, the initial tax to be levied, as proposed by the board, shall
be approved by the county fiscal court, consolidated local government,
charter county government, or unified local government having
jurisdiction over the district, and the initial tax levied shall not exceed
the highest tax rate currently levied by one (1) of the merging districts.
Any increase to the initial tax rate shall be subject to KRS 132.023. Any
increase in excess of the annual compensating rate for the consolidated
emergency services district shall require the approval of the county
fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter county government,
or unified local government having jurisdiction over the district. If at
any time an election[ resulting from a recall petition] pursuant to KRS
132.017 is required, the question shall be presented to all voters in every
precinct for which any part of the district serves.
(2) The property valuation administrator of the county in which the district is created,
with the cooperation of the board, shall note on the tax rolls the taxpayers and
valuation of the property subject to an[such] assessment. The county clerk shall
compute the tax on the regular state and county tax bills in a[such] manner as may
be directed by regulation of the Department of Revenue.
Page 8 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
(3) These taxes shall be subject to the same delinquency date, discounts, penalties, and
interest as are applied to the collection of ad valorem taxes and shall be collected by
the sheriff of the county involved and accounted for to the treasurer of the district.
The sheriff shall be entitled to a fee of the amount collected by him or her. The
fiscal court shall, in the ordinance set forth in subsection (2) of this section and in
consultation with the sheriff and the consolidated emergency services district, set a
collection fee for the sheriff in an amount not to exceed four and one-fourth percent
(4.25%).
Section 4. KRS 132.018 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the tax rate applicable to real property levied by a county fiscal court, district
board of education, or legislative body of a city, consolidated local government,
urban-county government, or other taxing district is reduced as a result of
reconsideration by the county fiscal court, district board of education, or legislative
body of a city, consolidated local government, urban-county government, or other
taxing district under the provisions of KRS 132.017(4)[(2)(j)], the tax rate
applicable to personal property levied under the provisions of KRS 68.248(1),
132.024(1), 132.029(1), and 160.473(1) shall be reduced by the respective county
fiscal court, district board of education, or legislative body of a city, consolidated
local government, urban-county government, or other taxing district to an amount
which will produce the same percentage increase in revenue from personal property
as the percentage increase in revenue from real property resulting from the reduced
tax rate applicable to real property.
(2) If the tax rate applicable to real property levied by a county fiscal court, district
board of education, or legislative body of a city, consolidated local government,
urban-county government, or other taxing district is reduced, under the provisions
of KRS 132.017(3), as a result of a majority of votes cast in an election being
opposed to the[such a] rate, the tax rate applicable to personal property levied by
Page 9 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
the respective county fiscal court, district board of education, or legislative body of
a city, consolidated local government, urban-county government, or other taxing
district shall be reduced, without further action by the levying body, to an amount
which will produce the same percentage increase in revenue from personal property
as the percentage increase in revenue from real property resulting from the reduced
tax rate applicable to real property.
Section 5. KRS 132.023 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No special purpose governmental entity shall levy a tax rate which exceeds the
compensating tax rate until the taxing district has complied with the provisions of
KRS 65A.110 and subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) A special purpose governmental entity proposing to levy a tax rate which
exceeds the compensating tax rate shall submit the proposed rate as required
by KRS 65A.110 and shall hold a public hearing to hear comments from the
public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be held in the same
location where the governing body of the city or county where the largest
number of citizens served by the special purpose governmental entity reside
meets, and shall be held immediately before a regularly scheduled meeting of
that governing body.
(b) The special purpose governmental entity shall advertise the hearing by
causing to be published at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches, the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
Page 10 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days, nor more than ten (10) days, after the day that the second
advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property in the special purpose governmental entity, addressed to the property
owner at his or her residence or principal place of business as shown on the
current year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The special purpose
governmental entity may set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(3) (a) [That portion of ]A tax rate levied by an action of a special purpose
governmental entity which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive
of revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount
of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate shall be subject to approval
by the voters of the taxing district under Section 1 of this Act[subject to a
recall vote or reconsideration by the special purpose governmental entity, as
provided for in KRS 132.017,] and shall be advertised as provided in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The special purpose governmental entity shall, within seven (7) days
following adoption of an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy a tax
Page 11 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
rate which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from
new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue
produced by the compensating tax rate, cause to be published, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the taxing district has adopted a rate; and
2. The fact that the[ part of the] rate[ which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property, in excess of four percent (4%) over
the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate] is subject
to recall[; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county in which the special purpose governmental entity is located, with
a notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate].
Section 6. KRS 132.027 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No city or urban-county government shall levy a tax rate which exceeds the
compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] until the city or urban-county
government has complied with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) Cities or urban-county governments proposing to levy a tax rate which
exceeds the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] shall hold a
public hearing to hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax
rate. The hearing shall be held in the principal office of the taxing district, or,
in the event the taxing district has no office, or the office is not suitable for a
hearing, the hearing shall be held in a suitable facility as near as possible to
the geographic center of the district.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall advertise the hearing by causing to
be published at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the newspaper of
Page 12 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than
twelve (12) column inches, the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than ten (10) days after the day the second
advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property in the taxing district, addressed to the property owner at his or her
residence or principal place of business as shown on the current year property
tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The taxing district may set
reasonable time limits for testimony.
(3) (a) That portion of a tax rate levied by an action of a city or urban-county
government which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of
revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of
Page 13 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
revenue produced by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010]
shall be subject to a recall vote or reconsideration by the taxing district, as
provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided for in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall, within seven (7) days following
adoption of an ordinance to levy a tax rate which will produce revenue from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property as defined in KRS
132.010, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced
by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010], cause to be
published, in the newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type
advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the city or urban-county government has adopted a rate;
and
2. The fact that the[ part of the] rate[ which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010] is subject to recall[, and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county or urban-county in which the taxing district is located, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate].
Section 7. KRS 160.470 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, no district board of
education shall levy a general tax rate which will produce more revenue,
exclusive of revenue from net assessment growth as defined in KRS 132.010,
than would be produced by application of the general tax rate that could have
been levied in the preceding year to the preceding year's assessment, except as
Page 14 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS 157.440.
(b) If an election is held as provided for in KRS 132.017 and the question should
fail, the[such] failure shall not reduce the "...general tax rate that could have
been levied in the preceding year...," referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this
section, for purposes of computing the general tax rate for succeeding years.
In the event of a merger of school districts, the limitations contained in this section
shall be based upon the combined revenue of the merging districts, as computed
under the provisions of this section.
(2) No district board of education shall levy a general tax rate within the limits imposed
in subsection (1) of this section which respectively exceeds the compensating tax
rate as defined in KRS 132.010, except as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of
this section, KRS 157.440, and KRS 157.621, until the district board of education
has complied with the provisions of subsection (7) of this section.
(3) Upon receipt of property assessments from the Department of Revenue, the
commissioner of education shall certify the following to each district board of
education:
(a) The general tax rate that a district board of education could levy under the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and the amount of revenue
expected to be produced;
(b) The compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 for a district's general
tax rate the amount of revenue expected to be produced;
(c) The general tax rate which will produce, respectively, no more revenue from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, than four percent (4%)
over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate as defined
in KRS 132.010, and the amount of revenue expected to be produced.
(4) Upon completion of action on property assessment data, the Department of
Revenue shall submit certified property assessment data as required in KRS
Page 15 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
133.125 to the chief state school officer.
(5) Within thirty (30) days after the district board of education has received its
assessment data, the rates levied shall be forwarded to the Kentucky Board of
Education for its approval or disapproval. The failure of the district board of
education to furnish the rates within the time prescribed shall not invalidate any
levy made thereafter.
(6) (a) Each district board of education shall, on or before January 31 of each
calendar year, formally and publicly examine detailed line item estimated
revenues and proposed expenditures for the subsequent fiscal year. On or
before May 30 of each calendar year, each district board of education shall
adopt a tentative working budget which shall include a minimum reserve of
two percent (2%) of the total budget.
(b) Each district board of education shall submit to the Kentucky Board of
Education no later than September 30, a close estimate or working budget
which shall conform to the administrative regulations prescribed by the
Kentucky Board of Education.
(7) (a) Except as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS
157.440, a district board of education proposing to levy a general tax rate
within the limits of subsection (1) of this section which exceed the
compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 shall hold a public hearing
to hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The
hearing shall be held in the principal office of the taxing district or, in the
event the taxing district has no office, or the office is not suitable for the[such
a] hearing, the hearing shall be held in a suitable facility as near as possible to
the geographic center of the district.
(b) The district board of education shall advertise the hearing by causing the
following to be published at least twice for two (2) consecutive weeks, in the
Page 16 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches:
1. The general tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue
produced by that rate;
2. The general tax rate for the current year, and the revenue expected to be
produced by that rate;
3. The compensating general tax rate, and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than ten (10) days after the day that the second
advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained herein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property, addressed to the property owner at his or her residence or principal
place of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The district board of
education may set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(8) (a) [That portion of ]A general tax rate, except as provided in subsections (9) and
(10) of this section, KRS 157.440, and KRS 157.621, levied by an action of a
district board of education which will produce, respectively, revenue from real
property, exclusive of revenue from new property, more than four percent
Page 17 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
(4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate as
defined in KRS 132.010, shall be subject to a recall vote or reconsideration by
the district board of education as provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be
advertised as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The district board of education shall, within seven (7) days following adoption
of an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy a general tax rate, except
as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS 157.440,
which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from
new property as defined in KRS 132.010, more than four percent (4%) over
the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate as defined in
KRS 132.010, cause the following to be published, in the newspaper of largest
circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than twelve
(12) column inches:
1. The fact that the district board of education has adopted the[such a] rate;
and
2. The fact that the [part of the ]rate [which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010] is subject to recall[; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county or urban-county in which the school district is located, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.]
(9) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, effective for school
years beginning after June 30, 1990, the board of education of each school
district shall levy a minimum equivalent tax rate of thirty cents ($0.30) for
general school purposes. Equivalent tax rate is defined as the rate which
Page 18 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1432
results when the income collected during the prior year from all taxes levied
by the district for school purposes is divided by the total assessed value of
property plus the assessment for motor vehicles certified by the Department of
Revenue. School districts collecting school taxes authorized by KRS 160.593
to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.633, or 160.635 to 160.648 for less than twelve
(12) months during a school year shall have included in income collected
under this section the pro rata tax collection for twelve (12) months.
(b) Failure of a board to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection may
constitute a forfeiture of office by its members pursuant to KRS 415.050 and
415.060.
(10) A district board of education may levy a general tax rate that will produce revenue
from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, that is four percent
(4%) over the amount of the revenue produced by the compensating tax rate as
defined in KRS 132.010.
Section 8. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 19 of 19
XXXX 2/3/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed